Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Judgments

Cross references. —

As to judgments generally, see chapter 16 of this title.

§ 1-21-401.
Endorsement of payments and satisfaction and release; requirements.

Every person recovering
a judgment in circuit court shall endorse on the original judgment
docket all payments made on the judgment, and when the judgment is
satisfied by settlement or other payment, endorse the satisfaction
and release on the judgment docket in the circuit court in which the
judgment was entered. Endorsement of partial payment or satisfaction
of the whole shall be made by the party recovering the judgment or
his attorney in the case within fifteen (15) days after the payment
has been made, and after each payment when more than one (1) payment
is made on any judgment. Each endorsement shall be dated and signed
by the person executing the same.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 14-714; W.S. 1957, § 1-618; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-401; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace court” twice.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-402.
Endorsement of payments and satisfaction and release; penalty.

Every person who collects
or is paid any money or other thing of value upon any judgment rendered
in any circuit court who fails to comply with the provisions of W.S.

1-21-401

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall
be punished by a fine for each offense of not less than twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200.00).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 72, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 14-715; W.S. 1957, § 1-619; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-402; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-403.
Appeal of forcible entry and detainer actions.

In any forcible entry
and detainer action appealed to the district court which is thereby
determined against the defendant in possession, the court shall hear
evidence concerning and render judgment for the rental value of the
premises in controversy for the whole period of the unlawful detainer.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 36, § 9; 1895, ch. 57, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4405; C.S. 1910, § 5268; C.S. 1920, § 6540; R.S. 1931, § 62-1210; C.S. 1945, § 14-810; W.S. 1957, § 1-630; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-403.

Cross references. —

As to action for forcible entry and detainer in justice of the peace courts, see §§

1-21-1001

to

1-21-1016

.